Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.160

Election on adoption of new charter.

Upon the filing of the proposed new, altered, changed or revised charter with the city clerk, it shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the city at an election to be called therefor pursuant to the provisions of law applicable to the holding of elections in such city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.160. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 137 s 2, part; 1895 c 27 s 2, part; RRS s 8956, part.]

NOTES:

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.